Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2405
Vehicle towed
away; properly parked; liability.

Any owner or tenant causing
the towing away of a vehicle
that is not improperly parked on a restricted lot shall cause the return of
the vehicle
to its owner or driver at no charge to such owner or driver. The person causing
the vehicle
to be towed shall be liable for any reasonably foreseeable damage incurred
by the owner or driver of the vehicle
due to loss of transportation.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 5.